src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-muuz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - muuʒ â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Nom: muuʒ
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Gen: muvʒʒi
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Acc: muvʒʒi
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Ill: muvʒʒǥa
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Loc: muvʒʒest
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Com: muvʒʒin
     muuʒ+N+Ess: muvʒʒen
     muuʒ+N+Par: muvʒʒed
     muuʒ+N+Sg+Abe: [muvʒʒitaa, muvʒʒitää]
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Nom: muvʒʒi
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Gen: muvʒʒji
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Acc: muvʒʒjid
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Ill: muvʒʒjid
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Loc: muvʒʒjin
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Com: muvʒʒjivuiʹm
     muuʒ+N+Pl+Abe: [muvʒʒjitaa, muvʒʒjitää]
     
